src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/V-A-I-apotaki_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - a'po'taki - ok : # -m animate intransitive verb, work AEW NA1
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+1Sg: nita'pao'taki
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+2Sg: kita'pao'taki
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+3Sg: a'pao'takiwa
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+4Sg: a'pao'takiyini
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+21Pl: [ a'pao'takio'pa, a'pao'takio'p ]
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+1Pl: [ nita'pao'takihpinnaana, nita'pao'takihpinnaan ]
     PS/ohkan+PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+2Pl: kitohkana'pao'takihpoaawa
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+3Pl+PRO+3/0Pl: a'pao'takiyaawa
     
     PS/yaak+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+1Sg: nitaaka'po'taki
     PS/yaak+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+2Sg: kitaaka'po'taki
     PS/yaak+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+3Sg: aaka'po'takiwa
     PS/yaak+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+4Sg: aaka'po'takiyini
     PS/yaak+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+21Pl: [ aaka'po'takio'pa, aaka'po'takio'p ]
     PS/yaak+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+1Pl: [ nitaaka'po'takihpinnaana, nitaaka'po'takihpinnaan ]
     PS/yaak+PS/ohkan+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+2Pl: kitaakohkana'po'takihpoaawa
     PS/yaak+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+3Pl+PRO+3/0Pl: aaka'po'takiyaawa
 
     a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+1Sg: nita'po'taki
     a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+2Sg: kita'po'taki
     a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+3Sg: a'po'takiwa
     a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+4Sg: a'po'takiyini
     a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+21Pl: [ a'po'takio'pa, a'po'takio'p ]
     a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+1Pl: [ nita'po'takihpinnaana, nita'po'takihpinnaan ]
     a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+2Pl: kita'po'takihpoaawa
     a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+3Pl+PRO+3/0Pl: a'po'takiyaawa
     
     PS/maat+PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+1Sg+Interr: nimaata'pao'takihpa
     PS/maat+PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+2Sg+Interr: kimaata'pao'takihpa
     PS/maat+PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+3Sg: maata'pao'takiwa
     PS/maat+PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+1Pl: [ nimaata'pao'takihpinnaana, nimaata'pao'takihpinnaan ]
     PS/maat+PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+3Pl+Interr: [ maata'pao'takiwaiksaawayi, maata'pao'takiwaiksaawa ]
     
     PS/maat+PS/yaak+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+1Sg+Interr: nimaataaka'po'takihpa
     PS/maat+PS/yaak+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+2Sg+Interr: kimaataaka'po'takihpa
     PS/maat+PS/yaak+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+3Sg: maataaka'po'takiwa
     PS/maat+PS/yaak+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+21Pl: [ maataaka'po'takio'pa, maataaka'po'takio'p ]
     PS/maat+PS/yaak+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+2Pl: kimaataaka'po'takihpoaawa
     PS/maat+PS/yaak+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+3Pl+Interr: [ maataaka'po'takiwaiksaawayi, maataaka'po'takiwaiksaawa ]
     
     PS/maat+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+1Sg+Interr: nimaata'po'takihpa
     PS/maat+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+2Sg+Interr: kimaata'po'takihpa
     PS/maat+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+3Sg+Interr: [ maata'po'takiwaatsiksiwa, maata'po'takiwaatsiksi ]
     PS/maat+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+1Pl: [ nimaata'po'takihpinnaana, nimaata'po'takihpinnaan ]
     PS/maat+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+3Pl+Interr: [ maata'po'takiwaiksaawayi, maata'po'takiwaiksaawa ]
    
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Cnj+1Sg: nita'pao'takssi
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Cnj+2Sg: kita'pao'takssi
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Cnj+3Sg: ota'pao'takssi
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Cnj+4Sg: a'pao'takssi
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Cnj+1Pl: [ nita'pao'takssinnaana, nita'pao'takssinnaana ]
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Cnj+21Pl: a'pao'takssi
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Cnj+2Pl: kita'pao'takssoaayi
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Cnj+3Pl: ota'pao'takssi
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Cnj+4Pl: a'pao'takssi
   
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Sbj+1Sg: a'pao'takiiniki
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Sbj+2Sg: a'pao'takiiniki
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Sbj+3Sg: a'pao'takisi
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Sbj+4Sg: a'pao'takisi
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Sbj+1Pl: a'pao'takiinnaaniki
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Sbj+21Pl: a'pao'takiinoainiki
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Sbj+2Pl: a'pao'takio'ki
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Sbj+3Pl: a'pao'takisi
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Sbj+4Pl: a'pao'takisi

     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Irr+1Sg: nita'pao'takihtopi
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Irr+2Sg: kita'pao'takihtopi
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Irr+3Sg: a'pao'takiwahtopi
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Irr+4Sg: a'pao'takiwahtopini
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Irr+1Pl: nita'pao'takihpinnaanopi
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Irr+21Pl: a'pao'takihpoaawopi
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Irr+2Pl: kita'pao'takiwahtopiyi
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Irr+3Pl: a'pao'takiwahtopiyi
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Irr+4Pl: a'pao'takiwahtopiyini
  
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Imp+2Sg: a'pao'takit
     PS/a+a'po'taki+VAI+Imp+2Pl: a'pao'takik
    
